Hawaii, session 2026, SB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 712-1248, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1) A person commits the offense of promoting a detrimental drug in the second degree if the person knowingly: (a)  Possesses fifty or more capsules or tablets containing one or more of the Schedule V substances; (b)  Possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one-eighth ounce or more, containing one or more of the Schedule V substances; (c)  Possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of [one ounce] thirty grams or more, containing any marijuana; or (d)  Distributes any marijuana or any Schedule V substance in any amount." SECTION 2.  Section 712-1249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§712-1249  Promoting a detrimental drug in the third degree.  (1)  A person commits the offense of promoting a detrimental drug in the third degree if the person knowingly possesses any marijuana or any Schedule V substance in any amount. (2)  Promoting a detrimental drug in the third degree is a petty misdemeanor; provided that possession of [three] fifteen grams or less of marijuana is a violation, punishable by a fine of $130." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________